Hawaii, session 2025, SB1252.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds the State's aging population is increasing rapidly, with approximately thirty-one thousand people aged sixty-five and older living with Alzheimer's disease or other forms of dementia. To prepare health care providers in caring for individuals with Alzheimer's disease and other forms of dementia, the university of Hawaii at Manoa's John A. Burns School of Medicine, university of Hawaii's Center for Aging, and university of Hawaii's Thompson School of Social Work and Public Health have been providing courses and actively engaging in educating and training students in Alzheimer's disease and other forms of dementia.  Additional staff positions are necessary to provide greater coordination between the various university of Hawaii programs in delivering training in caring for patients with Alzheimer's disease and other forms of dementia. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Appropriate funds to the university of Hawaii to establish positions within the university of Hawaii at Manoa John A. Burns School of Medicine's department of geriatric medicine to: (A)  Coordinate and incorporate training on Alzheimer's disease and other forms of dementia for health care providers into existing university of Hawaii programs; and (B)  Review, update, and develop a dementia curriculum to be incorporated into existing university of Hawaii programs with the goal of establishing a local, informed dementia workforce; and (2)  Require the university of Hawaii at Manoa John A. Burns School of Medicine's department of geriatric medicine to submit annual reports to the legislature. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $525,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment of two full-time equivalent (2.0 FTE) positions within the university of Hawaii at Manoa John A. Burns School of Medicine's department of geriatric medicine to: (1)  Coordinate and incorporate training on Alzheimer's disease and other forms of dementia for health care providers into existing university of Hawaii programs; and (2)  Review, update, and develop a dementia curriculum to be incorporated into existing university of Hawaii programs with the goal of establishing a local, informed dementia workforce. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  The university of Hawaii at Manoa John A. Burns School of Medicine's department of geriatric medicine shall submit an annual report to the legislature beginning December 15, 2025, through December 15, 2027, on the hiring of personnel and accomplishments realized pursuant to this Act. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.